Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.430

Performance audits—Definition.

For purposes of this chapter, "preliminary performance audit report" means a written document prepared after the completion of a performance audit to be submitted for comment before the final performance audit report. The preliminary performance audit report must contain the audit findings and any proposed recommendations to improve the efficiency, effectiveness, or accountability of the state agency being audited.

[ 2022 c 148 s 4; 2005 c 385 s 2.]